Utah statutes.
10-2-117.   Notification to lieutenant governor of election of city officers.

Within 10 days of the canvass of the final election of city officers under Section 10-2-116, the county clerk shall send written notice to the lieutenant governor of the name and position of each officer elected and the term for which each has been elected.

